Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-904
Solar energy collector, defined.

Solar energy collector shall mean a device, structure, or part of a device or structure which is used primarily to transform solar energy into thermal, chemical, or electrical energy. It includes any space or structural components specifically designed to retain heat derived from solar energy, any mechanism that converts wind energy into electrical energy, and any photosynthetic process specifically maintained to produce photosynthetic products.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 4.